Hawaii statutes.
[PART XIII.]
CAMPAIGN FINANCE

A. General Provisions

[§11-301] Purpose. The purpose
of this part is to provide transparency in the campaign finance process. Any
ambiguity in the provisions of this part shall be construed to support
transparency. [L 2010, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next